Illinois, session 104th, SB3949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1069 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)8    Sec. 5-1069. Group life, health, accident, hospital, and 9medical insurance.10    (a) The county board of any county may arrange to provide, 11for the benefit of employees of the county, group life, 12health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance, or any one 13or any combination of those types of insurance, or the county 14board may self-insure, for the benefit of its employees, all 15or a portion of the employees' group life, health, accident, 16hospital, and medical insurance, or any one or any combination 17of those types of insurance, including a combination of 18self-insurance and other types of insurance authorized by this 19Section, provided that the county board complies with all 20other requirements of this Section. The insurance may include 21provision for employees who rely on treatment by prayer or 22spiritual means alone for healing in accordance with the 23tenets and practice of a well recognized religious   SB3949- 2 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1denomination. The county board may provide for payment by the 2county of a portion or all of the premium or charge for the 3insurance with the employee paying the balance of the premium 4or charge, if any. If the county board undertakes a plan under 5which the county pays only a portion of the premium or charge, 6the county board shall provide for withholding and deducting 7from the compensation of those employees who consent to join 8the plan the balance of the premium or charge for the 9insurance.10    (b) If the county board does not provide for 11self-insurance or for a plan under which the county pays a 12portion or all of the premium or charge for a group insurance 13plan, the county board may provide for withholding and 14deducting from the compensation of those employees who consent 15thereto the total premium or charge for any group life, 16health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance.17    (c) The county board may exercise the powers granted in 18this Section only if it provides for self-insurance or, where 19it makes arrangements to provide group insurance through an 20insurance carrier, if the kinds of group insurance are 21obtained from an insurance company authorized to do business 22in the State of Illinois. The county board may enact an 23ordinance prescribing the method of operation of the insurance 24program.25    (d) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 26self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance   SB3949- 3 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 2include screening by low-dose mammography for all women 35 3years of age or older for the presence of occult breast cancer 4unless the county elects to provide mammograms itself under 5Section 5-1069.1. The coverage shall be as follows:6        (1) A baseline mammogram for women 35 to 39 years of 7    age.8        (2) An annual mammogram for women 40 years of age or 9    older.10        (3) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 11    medically necessary by the woman's health care provider 12    for women under 40 years of age and having a family history 13    of breast cancer, prior personal history of breast cancer, 14    positive genetic testing, or other risk factors.15        (4) For a group policy of accident and health 16    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 17    on or after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public 18    Act 101-580) this amendatory Act of the 101st General 19    Assembly, a comprehensive ultrasound screening of an 20    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 21    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 22    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 23    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 24    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 25        (5) For a group policy of accident and health 26    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed   SB3949- 4 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1    on or after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public 2    Act 101-580) this amendatory Act of the 101st General 3    Assembly, a diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 4    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 5    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 6    or physician assistant. 7    A policy subject to this subsection shall not impose a 8deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing 9requirement on the coverage provided; except that this 10sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 11to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 12health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 13pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 14U.S.C. 223). 15    For purposes of this subsection:16    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 17diagnostic mammography.18    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 19is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 20an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 21subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 22breast.23    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 24breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 25including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 26image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of   SB3949- 5 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 2breast. The term also includes digital mammography.3    (d-5) Coverage as described by subsection (d) shall be 4provided at no cost to the insured and shall not be applied to 5an annual or lifetime maximum benefit.6    (d-10) When health care services are available through 7contracted providers and a person does not comply with plan 8provisions specific to the use of contracted providers, the 9requirements of subsection (d-5) are not applicable. When a 10person does not comply with plan provisions specific to the 11use of contracted providers, plan provisions specific to the 12use of non-contracted providers must be applied without 13distinction for coverage required by this Section and shall be 14at least as favorable as for other radiological examinations 15covered by the policy or contract.16    (d-15) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 17self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 18coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 19include mastectomy coverage, which includes coverage for 20prosthetic devices or reconstructive surgery incident to the 21mastectomy. Coverage for breast reconstruction in connection 22with a mastectomy shall include:23        (1) reconstruction of the breast upon which the 24    mastectomy has been performed;25        (2) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to 26    produce a symmetrical appearance; and  SB3949- 6 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1        (3) prostheses and treatment for physical 2    complications at all stages of mastectomy, including 3    lymphedemas.4Care shall be determined in consultation with the attending 5physician and the patient. The offered coverage for prosthetic 6devices and reconstructive surgery shall be subject to the 7deductible and coinsurance conditions applied to the 8mastectomy, and all other terms and conditions applicable to 9other benefits. When a mastectomy is performed and there is no 10evidence of malignancy then the offered coverage may be 11limited to the provision of prosthetic devices and 12reconstructive surgery to within 2 years after the date of the 13mastectomy. As used in this Section, "mastectomy" means the 14removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary 15reasons, as determined by a licensed physician.16    A county, including a home rule county, that is a 17self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 18coverage for its employees, may not penalize or reduce or 19limit the reimbursement of an attending provider or provide 20incentives (monetary or otherwise) to an attending provider to 21induce the provider to provide care to an insured in a manner 22inconsistent with this Section. 23    (d-20) The requirement that mammograms be included in 24health insurance coverage as provided in subsections (d) 25through (d-15) is an exclusive power and function of the State 26and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6,   SB3949- 7 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution of home rule 2county powers. A home rule county to which subsections (d) 3through (d-15) apply must comply with every provision of those 4subsections.5    (d-25) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 6self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 7coverage, the insurance coverage shall include joint mental 8health therapy services for any member of the sheriff's 9office, including the sheriff, and any spouse or partner of 10the member who resides with the member. 11    The joint mental health therapy services provided under 12this subsection shall be performed by a physician licensed to 13practice medicine in all of its branches, a licensed clinical 14psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed 15clinical professional counselor, a licensed marriage and 16family therapist, a licensed social worker, or a licensed 17professional counselor. 18    This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 19Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 20concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 21exercised by the State. 22    (e) The term "employees" as used in this Section includes 23elected or appointed officials but does not include temporary 24employees.25    (f) The county board may, by ordinance, arrange to provide 26group life, health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance,   SB3949- 8 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1or any one or a combination of those types of insurance, under 2this Section to retired former employees and retired former 3elected or appointed officials of the county.4    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement this amendatory Act 5of the 95th General Assembly, if any, is conditioned on the 6rules being adopted in accordance with all provisions of the 7Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and 8procedures of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any 9purported rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is 10unauthorized. 11    (h) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 12self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 13coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 14include, on and after June 1, 2025, mental health counseling 15for any county employee who is a first responder without 16imposing a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other 17cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided, except that 18this subsection does not apply to the extent such coverage 19would disqualify a high-deductible health plan from 20eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to Section 21223 of the Internal Revenue Code.22    The requirement that mental health counseling be included 23in health insurance coverage as provided in this subsection is 24an exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial 25and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of 26the Illinois Constitution of home rule county powers.   SB3949- 9 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1    As used in this subsection: 2    "First responders" means police and corrections officers; , 3deputy sheriffs; , firefighters; , emergency medical services 4personnel, as that term is defined in Section 3.5 of the 5Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, dispatched 6pursuant to a 9-1-1 call; , emergency medical dispatchers, as 7that term is defined in Section 3.70 of the Emergency Medical 8Services (EMS) Systems Act; , public safety telecommunicators, 9as that term is defined in Section 2 of the Emergency Telephone 10System Act; , and mental health professionals employed and 11dispatched by any unit of local government in response to 12emergency crisis calls received on public emergency service 13lines instead of or in conjunction with law enforcement; and 14coroners. 15    "Mental health counseling" means counseling therapy 16sessions provided by a clinical social worker, professional 17counselor, or licensed psychologist. 18(Source: P.A. 103-818, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1011, eff. 1-1-25; 19revised 11-26-24.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)21    Sec. 5-1069. Group life, health, accident, hospital, and 22medical insurance.23    (a) The county board of any county may arrange to provide, 24for the benefit of employees of the county, group life, 25health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance, or any one   SB3949- 10 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1or any combination of those types of insurance, or the county 2board may self-insure, for the benefit of its employees, all 3or a portion of the employees' group life, health, accident, 4hospital, and medical insurance, or any one or any combination 5of those types of insurance, including a combination of 6self-insurance and other types of insurance authorized by this 7Section, provided that the county board complies with all 8other requirements of this Section. The insurance may include 9provision for employees who rely on treatment by prayer or 10spiritual means alone for healing in accordance with the 11tenets and practice of a well recognized religious 12denomination. The county board may provide for payment by the 13county of a portion or all of the premium or charge for the 14insurance with the employee paying the balance of the premium 15or charge, if any. If the county board undertakes a plan under 16which the county pays only a portion of the premium or charge, 17the county board shall provide for withholding and deducting 18from the compensation of those employees who consent to join 19the plan the balance of the premium or charge for the 20insurance.21    (b) If the county board does not provide for 22self-insurance or for a plan under which the county pays a 23portion or all of the premium or charge for a group insurance 24plan, the county board may provide for withholding and 25deducting from the compensation of those employees who consent 26thereto the total premium or charge for any group life,   SB3949- 11 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance.2    (c) The county board may exercise the powers granted in 3this Section only if it provides for self-insurance or, where 4it makes arrangements to provide group insurance through an 5insurance carrier, if the kinds of group insurance are 6obtained from an insurance company authorized to do business 7in the State of Illinois. The county board may enact an 8ordinance prescribing the method of operation of the insurance 9program.10    (d) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 11self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 12coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 13include screening by low-dose mammography for all patients 35 14years of age or older for the presence of occult breast cancer 15unless the county elects to provide mammograms itself under 16Section 5-1069.1. The coverage shall be as follows:17        (1) A baseline mammogram for patients 35 to 39 years 18    of age.19        (2) An annual mammogram for patients 40 years of age 20    or older.21        (3) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 22    medically necessary by the patient's health care provider 23    for patients under 40 years of age and having a family 24    history of breast cancer, prior personal history of breast 25    cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk factors.26        (4) For a group policy of accident and health   SB3949- 12 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 2    on or after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public 3    Act 101-580), a comprehensive ultrasound screening of an 4    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 5    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 6    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 7    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 8    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 9        (4.5) For a group policy of accident and health 10    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 11    on or after January 1, 2026 (the effective date of Public 12    Act 103-808) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 13    Assembly, molecular breast imaging (MBI) and magnetic 14    resonance imaging of an entire breast or breasts if a 15    mammogram demonstrates heterogeneous or dense breast 16    tissue or when medically necessary as determined by a 17    physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its 18    branches, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician 19    assistant. 20        (5) For a group policy of accident and health 21    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 22    on or after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public 23    Act 101-580), a diagnostic mammogram when medically 24    necessary, as determined by a physician licensed to 25    practice medicine in all its branches, advanced practice 26    registered nurse, or physician assistant.   SB3949- 13 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1    A policy subject to this subsection shall not impose a 2deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing 3requirement on the coverage provided; except that this 4sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 5to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 6health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 7pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 8U.S.C. 223). 9    For purposes of this subsection:10    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 11diagnostic mammography.12    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 13is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 14an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 15subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 16breast.17    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 18breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 19including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 20image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 21less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 22breast. The term also includes digital mammography.23    (d-5) Coverage as described by subsection (d) shall be 24provided at no cost to the insured and shall not be applied to 25an annual or lifetime maximum benefit.26    (d-10) When health care services are available through   SB3949- 14 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1contracted providers and a person does not comply with plan 2provisions specific to the use of contracted providers, the 3requirements of subsection (d-5) are not applicable. When a 4person does not comply with plan provisions specific to the 5use of contracted providers, plan provisions specific to the 6use of non-contracted providers must be applied without 7distinction for coverage required by this Section and shall be 8at least as favorable as for other radiological examinations 9covered by the policy or contract.10    (d-15) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 11self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 12coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 13include mastectomy coverage, which includes coverage for 14prosthetic devices or reconstructive surgery incident to the 15mastectomy. Coverage for breast reconstruction in connection 16with a mastectomy shall include:17        (1) reconstruction of the breast upon which the 18    mastectomy has been performed;19        (2) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to 20    produce a symmetrical appearance; and21        (3) prostheses and treatment for physical 22    complications at all stages of mastectomy, including 23    lymphedemas.24Care shall be determined in consultation with the attending 25physician and the patient. The offered coverage for prosthetic 26devices and reconstructive surgery shall be subject to the   SB3949- 15 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1deductible and coinsurance conditions applied to the 2mastectomy, and all other terms and conditions applicable to 3other benefits. When a mastectomy is performed and there is no 4evidence of malignancy then the offered coverage may be 5limited to the provision of prosthetic devices and 6reconstructive surgery to within 2 years after the date of the 7mastectomy. As used in this Section, "mastectomy" means the 8removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary 9reasons, as determined by a licensed physician.10    A county, including a home rule county, that is a 11self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 12coverage for its employees, may not penalize or reduce or 13limit the reimbursement of an attending provider or provide 14incentives (monetary or otherwise) to an attending provider to 15induce the provider to provide care to an insured in a manner 16inconsistent with this Section. 17    (d-20) The requirement that mammograms be included in 18health insurance coverage as provided in subsections (d) 19through (d-15) is an exclusive power and function of the State 20and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, 21subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution of home rule 22county powers. A home rule county to which subsections (d) 23through (d-15) apply must comply with every provision of those 24subsections.25    (d-25) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 26self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance   SB3949- 16 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1coverage, the insurance coverage shall include joint mental 2health therapy services for any member of the sheriff's 3office, including the sheriff, and any spouse or partner of 4the member who resides with the member. 5    The joint mental health therapy services provided under 6this subsection shall be performed by a physician licensed to 7practice medicine in all of its branches, a licensed clinical 8psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed 9clinical professional counselor, a licensed marriage and 10family therapist, a licensed social worker, or a licensed 11professional counselor. 12    This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 13Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 14concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 15exercised by the State. 16    (e) The term "employees" as used in this Section includes 17elected or appointed officials but does not include temporary 18employees.19    (f) The county board may, by ordinance, arrange to provide 20group life, health, accident, hospital, and medical insurance, 21or any one or a combination of those types of insurance, under 22this Section to retired former employees and retired former 23elected or appointed officials of the county.24    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement this amendatory Act 25of the 95th General Assembly, if any, is conditioned on the 26rules being adopted in accordance with all provisions of the   SB3949- 17 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and 2procedures of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any 3purported rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is 4unauthorized. 5    (h) If a county, including a home rule county, is a 6self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 7coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 8include, on and after June 1, 2025, mental health counseling 9for any county employee who is a first responder without 10imposing a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other 11cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided, except that 12this subsection does not apply to the extent such coverage 13would disqualify a high-deductible health plan from 14eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to Section 15223 of the Internal Revenue Code.16    The requirement that mental health counseling be included 17in health insurance coverage as provided in this subsection is 18an exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial 19and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of 20the Illinois Constitution of home rule county powers. 21    As used in this subsection: 22    "First responders" means police and corrections officers; , 23deputy sheriffs; , firefighters; , emergency medical services 24personnel, as that term is defined in Section 3.5 of the 25Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, dispatched 26pursuant to a 9-1-1 call; , emergency medical dispatchers, as   SB3949- 18 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1that term is defined in Section 3.70 of the Emergency Medical 2Services (EMS) Systems Act; , public safety telecommunicators, 3as that term is defined in Section 2 of the Emergency Telephone 4System Act; , and mental health professionals employed and 5dispatched by any unit of local government in response to 6emergency crisis calls received on public emergency service 7lines instead of or in conjunction with law enforcement; and 8coroners. 9    "Mental health counseling" means counseling therapy 10sessions provided by a clinical social worker, professional 11counselor, or licensed psychologist. 12(Source: P.A. 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-818, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-1011, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 15changing Section 10-4-2.4 as follows: 16    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.4)17    Sec. 10-4-2.4. Mental health counseling.18    (a) As used in this Section:19    "First responders" means police and corrections officers; , 20deputy sheriffs; , firefighters; , emergency medical services 21personnel, as that term is defined in Section 3.5 of the 22Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, dispatched 23pursuant to a 9-1-1 call; , emergency medical dispatchers, as 24that term is defined in Section 3.70 of the Emergency Medical   SB3949- 19 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1Services (EMS) Systems Act; , public safety telecommunicators, 2as that term is defined in Section 2 of the Emergency Telephone 3System Act; , and mental health professionals employed and 4dispatched by any unit of local government in response to 5emergency crisis calls received on public emergency service 6lines instead of or in conjunction with law enforcement; and 7coroners. 8    "Mental health counseling" means counseling therapy 9sessions provided by a clinical social worker, professional 10counselor, or licensed psychologist. 11    (b) If a municipality, including a home rule municipality, 12is a self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 13coverage for its employees, the insurance coverage shall 14include, on and after June 1, 2025, mental health counseling 15for any employee who is a first responder without imposing a 16deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing 17requirement on the coverage provided, except that this Section 18does not apply to the extent such coverage would disqualify a 19high-deductible health plan from eligibility for a health 20savings account pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal 21Revenue Code.22    (c) The requirement that mental health counseling be 23included in health insurance coverage as provided in this 24Section is an exclusive power and function of the State and is 25a denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, 26subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution of home rule   SB3949- 20 -LRB104 15200 RTM 28346 b1powers.2(Source: P.A. 103-1011, eff. 1-1-25.) 3    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 4changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 5that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 6represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 7not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 8made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 9Public Act.